District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1337

Exemption from District income tax.

Repealed.

History

July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 3, 36 DCR 4160

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2537.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 8-17: Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-17 provided that § 2(a), (b) and (c) and 3 shall apply to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 1988. Section 2(d) and (e) shall apply to all taxable periods beginning after September 30, 1989. All other sections of the act shall apply as of July 1, 1989.